Washington statutes.
RCW 40.14.025

Division of archives and records management—Allocation of costs of services—Public records efficiency, preservation, and access account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

(1) The secretary of state and the director of financial management shall jointly establish a procedure and formula for allocating the costs of services provided by the division of archives and records management to state agencies. The total amount allotted for services to state agencies shall not exceed the appropriation to the *archives and records management account during any allotment period.

(2) There is created the public records efficiency, preservation, and access account in the state treasury which shall consist of all fees and charges collected under this section. The account shall be appropriated exclusively for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation of the division of archives and records management as specified by law.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 932; 2003 c 163 s 1; 1996 c 245 s 3; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 5; 1985 c 57 s 22; 1981 c 115 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "archives and records management account" was changed to the "public records efficiency, preservation, and access account" by 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 932.

Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 50: See note following RCW 15.76.115.

Effective date—1996 c 245: "This act takes effect on July 1, 1996." [ 1996 c 245 s 5.]

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.

Effective date—1981 c 115: See note following RCW 40.14.020.